galician.aff
#        Affix table for Galician (mínimos)
#           For ISpell (3.1...)
#
# Copyright 2001-03 by André Ventas & Ramón Flores, under GNU GPL license
#
#
# This affix file uses both upper- and lower-case affix flags, so you
# must              #define MASKBITS 64 in your local.h file.
#
# 8 bits used (latin1) (please remove the #define NO8BIT line)
#
#
#    available modes:
#        -T lat         (latin1)
#        -T tex			(\'a \'e \~n ...)
#        -T pre         ('a 'e ~n ...)
#
# 
# Flags used:
#
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
# Used:      ****    * * *    ** *  *** ****** **   ****  ********                 
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
# Available:     ++++ + + ++++  + ++          +  +++    ++  
#
#
#
#    Any comments, important new words, and errors should be mailed to
#                 Ramon Flores (fa2ramon@usc.es)
#
#                      Last update: 9 de Xaneiro de 2003


allaffixes on

defstringtype "lat" "nroff" ".list"

wordchars         a            A
stringchar        á            Á
wordchars        [b-e]       [B-E]
stringchar        é            É
wordchars        [f-i]        [F-I]
stringchar        í            Í
wordchars        [j-n]        [J-N]
stringchar	   ñ            Ñ
wordchars		   o			 O
stringchar        ó            Ó
wordchars        [p-u]        [P-U]
stringchar        ú            Ú
stringchar        ü            Ü
wordchars        [v-z]        [V-Z]

#
#
altstringtype "pre" "nroff" ".pre"

altstringchar \'a á
altstringchar \'e é
altstringchar \'i í
altstringchar \'o ó
altstringchar \'u ú
altstringchar \"u ü
altstringchar \~n ñ

altstringchar \'A Á
altstringchar \'E É
altstringchar \'I Í
altstringchar \'O Ó
altstringchar \'U Ú
altstringchar \"U Ü
altstringchar \~N Ñ


#
# Plain TeX
#
altstringtype "tex" "nroff" ".tex"

altstringchar \\\'a á
altstringchar \\\'e é
altstringchar \\\'{\\i} í
altstringchar \\\'o ó
altstringchar \\\'u ú
altstringchar \\\"u ü
altstringchar \\\~n ñ

altstringchar \\\'A Á
altstringchar \\\'E É
altstringchar \\\'I Í
altstringchar \\\'O Ó
altstringchar \\\'U Ú
altstringchar \\\"U Ü
altstringchar \\\~N Ñ  

prefixes

flag *A:		    # anti
 .        > ANTI           # "FSEM=anti"   # ex. venenoso -> antivenenoso

flag *B:           # anti-
 .        > ANTI\-         # "FSEM=anti"   # ex. semita -> anti-semita

flag *S:           # des
[^HS]     > DES            # "FSEM=non"    # ex. amarrar->desamarrar
H         > -H,DES         # "FSEM=non"    # ex. habitar->desabitar
S         > DE			  # "FSEM=non"    # ex. salgar->desalgar

flag *I:           #in
[^PLMR]   > IN             # "FSEM=non"    # ex. finito -> infinito
P         > IM             # "FSEM=non"    # ex. paciente->impaciente
[LM]      > I              # "FSEM=non"    # ex. material->imaterial
R         > IR             # "FSEM=non"    # ex. real->irreal

flag *R:           #re
 .        > RE             # "FSEM=outra"  # ex. encontrar -> reencontrar

flag *U:           #sub
[^BHR]	> SUB  		  # "FSEM=sub"    # ex. comandante->subcomandante


suffixes

#-------------------------------------------
# plurais

flag *p:          # "CAT=a_nc,N=s"      #plurais
[^LSMRZ]      >  S       # "N=p"    # pato->patos
[AU] L        > -L,IS    # "N=p"    # animal->animais
[^B] E L      > -EL,ÉIS  # "N=p"    # papel->papéis
O L           > -OL,ÓIS  # "N=p"    # anzol->anzóis
I L           > -L,S     # "N=p"    # funil->funis       # terminación -il tónica
[ÁÉÍÓÚ] B E L > -L,IS    # "N=p"    # afábel->afábeis
[^ÁÉ] S       >  ES      # "N=p"    # deus->deuses
Á S           > -ÁS,ASES # "N=p"    # gás->gases
É S           > -ÉS,ESES # "N=p"    # lugués->lugueses
M             > -M,NS    # "N=p"    # album->albuns
R             >  ES      # "N=p"    # mar->mares
Z             > -Z,CES   # "N=p"    # vez->veces

flag *a:           # "CAT=a_nc,N=s"      #plurais
I L           > -IL,EIS  # "N=p"    # áxil->áxeis        # terminación -il átona


#-----------------------------------------
# femininos - os mais habituais

flag *f:        # "CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s"     #femininos
O      > -O,A      # "G=f"            # pato->pata
O      > -O,AS     # "G=f,N=p"        # pato->patas
O R	  > A         # "G=f"		   # profesor->profesora
O R    > AS        # "G=f,N=p"	   # profesor->profesoras
[^É] S > A         # "G=f"            # deus -> deusa
[^É] S > AS        # "G=f,N=p"        # deus -> deusas
É S	  > -ÉS,ESA   # "G=f" 		   # lugués->luguesa
É S	  > -ÉS,ESAS  # "G=f,N=p" 	   # lugués->luguesas
Ó N    > -ÓN,OA    # "G=f"		   # león->leoa
Ó N    > -ÓN,OAS   # "G=f,N=p"	   # león->leoas
Á N    > -N,-      # "G=f"		   # irmán->irmá
Á N    > -N,S      # "G=f,N=p"	   # irmán->irmás
A O    > -AO,Á     # "G=f"		   # limiao->limiá
A O    > -AO,ÁS    # "G=f,N=p"	   # limiao->limiás

flag *b:         # "CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s"  #femininos
Ó N    > -ÓN,ONA      # "G=f"         # pobretón -> pobretona
Ó N    > -ÓN,ONAS     # "G=f,N=p"     # pobretón -> pobretonas
Á N    > -ÁN,ANA      # "G=f"         # sultán -> sultana
Á N    > -ÁN,ANAS     # "G=f,N=p"     # sultán -> sultanas
T O R  > -TOR,TRIZ    # "G=f"		   # actor->actriz
T O R  > -TOR,TRICES  # "G=f,N=p"     # actor->actrices
D O R  > -DOR,TRIZ    # "G=f"		   # imperador->imperatriz
D O R  > -DOR,TRICES  # "G=f,N=p"     # imperador->imperatrices


#----------------------------------------
# mente

flag *m:         # "CAT=adj,N=s"       #mente
O             > -O,AMENTE       # "CAT=adv"    # aberto->abertamente
[^B][^N~][^O] >  MENTE          # "CAT=adv"    # anterior->anteriormente  
Á B E L       > -ÁBEL,ABELMENTE # "CAT=adv"    # amábel->amabelmente
Í B E L       > -ÍBEL,IBELMENTE # "CAT=adv"    # horríbel->horribelmente

#----------------------------------------
# ísimo
flag *s:         # "CAT=adj,N=s"       #isimo
[^CZG]O     > -O,ÍSIMO     # "GR=sup"           # alto->altísimo
C O         > -CO,QUÍSIMO  # "GR=sup"           # pouco->pouquísimo
Z O         > -ZO,CÍSIMO   # "GR=sup"           # macizo->macicísimo
G O         > -O,UÍSIMO    # "GR=sup"           # meigo->meiguísimo
E           > -E,ÍSIMO     # "GR=sup"           # leve->levísimo
[LR]        >  ÍSIMO       # "GR=sup"           # normal->normalísimo
É S         > -ÉS,ESÍSIMO  # "GR=sup"           # coruñés->coruñesísimo
Z           > -Z,CÍSIMO    # "GR=sup"           # feliz->felicísimo

[^CZG]O     > -O,ÍSIMA     # "GR=sup,G=f"       # alto->altísima
C O         > -CO,QUÍSIMA  # "GR=sup,G=f"       # pouco->pouquísima
Z O         > -ZO,CÍSIMA   # "GR=sup,G=f"       # macizo->macicísima
G O         > -O,UÍSIMA    # "GR=sup,G=f"       # meigo->meiguísima
E           > -E,ÍSIMA     # "GR=sup,G=f"       # leve->levísima
[LR]        >  ÍSIMA       # "GR=sup,G=f"       # normal->normalísima
É S         > -ÉS,ESÍSIMA  # "GR=sup,G=f"       # coruñés->coruñesísima
Z           > -Z,CÍSIMA    # "GR=sup,G=f"       # feliz->felicísima

[^CZG]O     > -O,ÍSIMOS    # "GR=sup,N=p"       # alto->altísimos
C O         > -CO,QUÍSIMOS # "GR=sup,N=p"       # pouco->pouquísimos
Z O         > -ZO,CÍSIMOS  # "GR=sup,N=p"       # macizo->macicísimos
G O         > -O,UÍSIMOS   # "GR=sup,N=p"       # meigo->meiguísimos
E           > -E,ÍSIMOS    # "GR=sup,N=p"       # leve->levísimos
[LR]        > ÍSIMOS       # "GR=sup,N=p"       # normal->normalísimos
É S         > -ÉS,ESÍSIMOS # "GR=sup,N=p"       # coruñés->coruñesísimos
Z           > -Z,CÍSIMOS   # "GR=sup,N=p"       # feliz->felicísimos

[^CZG]O     > -O,ÍSIMAS    # "GR=sup,G=f,N=p"   # alto->altísimas
C O         > -CO,QUÍSIMAS # "GR=sup,G=f,N=p"   # pouco->pouquísimas
Z O         > -ZO,CÍSIMAS  # "GR=sup,G=f,N=p"   # macizo->macicísimas
G O         > -O,UÍSIMAS   # "GR=sup,G=f,N=p"   # meigo->meiguísimas
E           > -E,ÍSIMAS    # "GR=sup,G=f,N=p"   # leve->levísimas
[LR]        >  ÍSIMAS      # "GR=sup,G=f,N=p"   # normal->normalísimas
É S         > -ÉS,ESÍSIMAS # "GR=sup,G=f,N=p"   # coruñés->coruñesísimas
Z           > -Z,CÍSIMAS   # "GR=sup,G=f,N=p"   # feliz->felicísimas

#-----------------------------------------
# idade
flag *d:         # "CAT=adj,N=s"       #idade
[^ZG]O      > -O,IDADE         # "CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd" # activo->actividade
Z O         > -ZO,CIDADE       # "CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd" # castizo->casticidade
G O         > -O,ÜIDADE        # "CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd" # antigo->antiguidade
E           > -E,IDADE         # "CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd" # breve->brevidade
R           >  IDADE           # "CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd" # angular->angularidade
[^B][^N~] L >  IDADE           # "CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd" # amoral->amoralidade
Á B E L     > -ÁBEL,ABILIDADE  # "CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd" # amábel->amabilidade
Í B E L     > -ÍBEL,IBILIDADE  # "CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd" # sensíbel->sensibilidade
Z           > -Z,CIDADE        # "CAT=nc,G=f,FSEM=dd" # feroz->ferocidade

[^ZG]O      > -O,IDADE         # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd" # activo->actividades
G O         > -O,ÜIDADES       # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd" # antigo->antigüidades
[^B][^N~] L > IDADES           # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dd" # funcional->funcionalidades

#-----------------------------------------
# ismo
flag *i:         # "CAT=nc,N=s"   #ismo
[^CZ]O      >  -O,ISMO        # "FSEM=ismo"   	# activo->activismo
C O         >  -CO,QUISMO     # "FSEM=ismo"   	# barroco->barroquismo
Z O         >  -ZO,CISMO      # "FSEM=ismo"   	# castizo->casticismo
[^ICG]A     >  -A,ISMO        # "FSEM=ismo"   	# buda->budismo
I A         >  -A,SMO         # "FSEM=ismo"   	# academia->academismo
C A         >  -CA,QUISMO     # "FSEM=ismo"   	# benfica->benfiquismo
G A         >  -GA,GUISMO     # "FSEM=ismo"   	# colega->coleguismo
E           >  -E,ISMO        # "FSEM=ismo"   	# enxebre->enxebrismo
[LR]        >   ISMO          # "FSEM=ismo"   	# actual->actualismo
É S         >  -ÉS,ESISMO     # "FSEM=ismo"   	# chinés->chinesismo

#-----------------------------------------
# ista
flag *t:          # "CAT=nc,N=s"  #ista
[^CZ]O      >  -O,ISTA        # "FSEM=ista"  	# folleto->folletista
C O         >  -CO,QUISTA     # "FSEM=ista"  	# barroco->barroquista
Z O         >  -ZO,CISTA      # "FSEM=ista"  	# castizo->casticista
[^IZG] A    >  -A,ISTA        # "FSEM=ista"  	# bomba->bombista
I A         >  -A,STA         # "FSEM=ista"  	# anarquia->anarquista
Z A         >  -ZA,CISTA      # "FSEM=ista"  	# cobranza->cobrancista
G A         >  -A,UISTA       # "FSEM=ista"  	# droga->droguista
E           >  -E,ISTA        # "FSEM=ista"  	# arte->artista
[LR]        >  ISTA           # "FSEM=ista"  	# flor->florista

[^CZ]O      > -O,ISTAS        # "N=p,FSEM=ista"   # folleto->folletistas
C O         > -CO,QUISTAS     # "N=p,FSEM=ista"   # barroco->barroquistas
Z O         > -ZO,CISTAS      # "N=p,FSEM=ista"   # casticista->casticistas
[^IZG] A    > -A,ISTAS        # "N=p,FSEM=ista"   # bomba->bombistas
I A         > -A,STAS         # "N=p,FSEM=ista"   # anarquia->anarquistas
Z A         > -ZA,CISTAS      # "N=p,FSEM=ista"   # cobranza->cobrancistas
G A         > -A,UISTAS       # "N=p,FSEM=ista"   # droga->droguistas
E           > -E,ISTAS        # "N=p,FSEM=ista"   # arte->artistas
[LR]        >  ISTAS          # "N=p,FSEM=ista"   # flor->floristas
